en: Storage tank application: Chemicals; Fuel; Waste; Water; Other
cs: Aplikace skladovací nádrže: Chemikálie; Palivo; Odpad; Voda; Jiné
it: Applicazione del serbatoio di stoccaggio: Prodotti chimici; Carburante; Rifiuti; Acqua; Altro
th: การใช้งานถังเก็บน้ำ: สารเคมี; เชื้อเพลิง; ของเสีย; น้ำ; อื่นๆ
fr: Application de réservoir de stockage: Produits chimiques; Carburant; Déchets; Eau; Autre
sv: Tillämpning för lagringstank: Kemikalier; Bränsle; Avfall; Vatten; Övrigt
fi: Varastointisäiliön käyttökohde: Kemikaalit; Polttoaine; Jäte; Vesi; Muu
lt-LT: Sandėliavimo bako paskirtis: Cheminės medžiagos; Kuras; Atliekos; Vanduo; Kita
bg-BG: Приложение на резервоар за съхранение: Химикали; Гориво; Отпадъци; Вода; Други
vi: Ứng dụng bể chứa: Hóa chất; Nhiên liệu; Rác thải; Nước; Khác
ko: 저장 탱크 적용: 화학약품; 연료; 쓰레기; 물; 기타
hu: Tárolótartály alkalmazási területe: Vegyszerek; Üzemanyag; Hulladék; Víz; Egyéb
pt-BR: Aplicação de tanque de armazenamento: Químicos; Combustível; Resíduo; Água; Outro
es: Aplicación del tanque de almacenamiento: Productos químicos; Combustible; Desperdicios; Agua; Otros
sk-SK: Použitie zásobníka: Chemikálie; Palivo; Odpad; Voda; Iné
zh-TW: 儲槽應用: 化學材料; 燃料; 廢棄物; 水; 其他
sl-SI: Uporaba zalogovnika: Kemikalije; Gorivo; Odpadki; Voda; Drugo
de: Anwendung des Lagertanks: Chemikalien; Treibstoff; Abfall; Wasser; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Domeniu de utilizare rezervor de depozitare: Substanțe chimice; Carburant; Deșeuri; Apă; Altele
ja: 貯蔵タンクの用途: 化学製品; 燃料; 廃棄物; 水; その他
tr: Depolama tankı uygulaması: Kimyasallar; Yakıt; Atık; Su; Diğer
pt-PT: Aplicação de tanque de armazenamento: Químicos; Combustível; Desperdício; Água; Outro
ru: Применение резервуара-накопителя: Химические вещества; Топливо; Отходы; Вода; Другое
pl: Zastosowanie zbiornika magazynowego: Chemikalia; Paliwo; Odpady; Woda; Inne
el: Εφαρμογή δεξαμενής αποθήκευσης: Χημικά; Καύσιμα; Απόβλητα; Νερό; Άλλο
nb: Bruk for lagringstank: Kjemikalier; Drivstoff; Avfall; Vann; Annet
hr-HR: Primjena spremnika: Kemikalije; Gorivo; Otpad; Voda; Ostalo
nl: Toepassing opslagtank: Chemicaliën; Brandstof; Afval; Water; Andere
zh-CN: 储罐应用: 化学品; 燃油; 废弃物; 饮用水/纯净水; 其他
da: Anvendelse af lagertank: Kemikalier; Brændstof; Spild; Vand; Andet